src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! # Nenets twol file

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-yrk/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

Alphabet

!! ## Letters of the alphabet
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ң о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н Ң О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я   !!≈ * **@CODE@** 

°:0  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Directly from Tapani Salminen extra short vowel

ә:а  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Directly from Tapani Salminen schwa

 ˮ ! Non-nasal glottal
 ʼ ! Nasal glottal

! other symbols
   %- !0

!! ## Archiphonemes for vowels

%{ауоэØ%}:а   !!≈ * @CODE@  А1:а А1:у А1:о А1:э SCHWA
%{ауоэиыØ%}:0 !!≈ * @CODE@ before pros

А2:а  !!= * @CODE@
!А2:0

Ы1:о   !!= * @CODE@
Ы1:е  !!= * @CODE@

Ы2:э  !!= * @CODE@
Д1:д ! trond added due to compiler complaint

!! ## Archiphonemes for glottals

 %{нңʼØ%}:ʼ   !!= * @CODE@
 %{нңʼØ%}:н   !!= * @CODE@
 %{нңʼØ%}:0   !!= * @CODE@
 %{йнңъʼØ%}:й   !!= * @CODE@
 %{йнңъʼØ%}:н   !!= * @CODE@
 %{йнңъʼØ%}:ң   !!= * @CODE@
 %{йнңъʼØ%}:ъ   !!= * @CODE@
 %{йнңъʼØ%}:ʼ   !!= * @CODE@
 %{йнңъʼØ%}:0   !!= * @CODE@
 %{дˮØ%}:ˮ   !!= * @CODE@
 %{дˮØ%}:д   !!= * @CODE@
 %{дˮØ%}:0   !!= * @CODE@
 С1:ˮ   !!= * @CODE@
 С1:с   !!= * @CODE@
 С1:0   !!= * @CODE@

 %{ая%}:а         !!= * @CODE@ in Pros
 %{оё%}:о         !!= * @CODE@ in +N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3
 %{рл%}:0	   !!= * @CODE@ +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2

 %{аяуюØ%}:0	!!≈ * **@CODE@** хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: ханув, ханав
!хонась+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg3: хонасьˮ

 %{увм%}:0	   !!≈ * **@CODE@** +N+Sg+Pros

 %{вм%}:0	   !!≈ * **@CODE@** +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1

!! ## triggers

 %^SCSG2:0    !!= * @CODE@ this allows n2d +V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2:%>н°%^SCSG2
 %^PLNOM:0    !!= * @CODE@ disallows i2e +N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScPl3
 %^A2O:0     !!= * @CODE@ 
 %^A2I:0       !!= * @CODE@ 

 %^PalVariation:0 !!≈ * **@CODE@** This allows for тар%{дˮØ%}%>д%{оё%}нзь

 %^MLenition:0 !!= * @CODE@ lenition
 %^VowLower:0 !!= * @CODE@ vowel lowering ы:э у:о
 %^VowRaise:0 !!= * @CODE@ vowel raising э:ы о:у
 %^VowLoss:0    !!= * @CODE@  stem-final vowel is lost in plural accusative
 %^StemVowFronting:0    !!= * @CODE@  хасава:хасев
 %^VowFronting:0    !!= * @CODE@  хадась:хадэйнинзь
 %^PalLoss:0    !!= * @CODE@  in combination with stem-final vowel loss тёня:тён
 %^HardFronting:0    !!= * @CODE@  яля:ялэ


!! ## Boundary symbols

 %>     !!= * @CODE@ 
 #         !! hash

 ;



Sets
Vow =   а е ё и о у ы э ю я
        А Е Ё И О У Ы Э Ю Я ;

CnsNotGlots = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц
              Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц
              ч ш щ
              Ч Ш Щ  ;
DentStops = д н т  Д Н Т ;
Glots = ˮ ʼ ;
GLTS = %{нңʼØ%} %{йнңъʼØ%} %{дˮØ%} С1 ;

Cns =  б в г д ж з к л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ш 
       Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш ;
Cst =  к п т ф х ц ч ш с 
       К П Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш С ;

Ltrs = Vow Cns  ъ ь Ъ Ь ;

all =  Ltrs  %- ;




Definitions

LFV = [ е | ю | ё | и ] ;

LBV = [ а | я | [ #: | CnsNotGlots ] [ у | о | э | ы ] ] ;

PAIRSYLL = [ Vow:+ Cns:+ Vow: Cns:* ] ;

2InitSylls = [ Cns* Vow Cns* Vow ] ;

2VowCenterLC =  Cns* Vow: \[ °: | ә: | Vow: | %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: ]*  [ Vow: | %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: ] \[ °: | ә: | Vow: | %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: ]* ;

3VowCenterLC =  Cns* Vow: \[ °: | ә: | Vow: | %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: ]*  [ °: | ә: | Vow: | %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: ] \[ °: | ә: | Vow: | %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: ]* [ °: | ә: | Vow: | %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: ] \[ °: | ә: | Vow: | %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: ]* ;


!! # Rules

Rules



"к: -> г after nasal glottal"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 к:г <=> [ ʼ: | %{йнңъʼØ%}: | ң | %{нңʼØ%}: | м ] %> _ ( °: ) ;
!!€ му{нңʼØ}>кʼ
!!€ муң>гʼ

!!€ ил°{йнңъʼØ}>к°ʼ
!!€ илаң>г0ʼ


! This test (with two outputs) does not work technically, 
! the latter output is attached to the next test pair and thus
! destroying all remaining tests
! check these four lines 2023-08-30
!€# ңум{йнңъʼØ}>к°н{ая}
!€0 ңум0>г0на
!€# ңум{йнңъʼØ}>к°н{ая}
!€0 ңум0>гана

"к: to х after Vowels"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 к:х <=>  [Vow: | °: ] (%^VowLower:|%^VowLoss:) %> _  ;
!!€# ты^VowLower>да
!!€0 тэ0>да
!!€# ед°>к{ауоэØ}на
!!€0 ед0>хана
!!€# намда^VowLoss>к{ауоэØ}в
!!€0 намд00>хав

"nTod"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 н:д <=>   [ %{йнңъʼØ%}: | %{нңʼØ%}: | ʼ: ] %^SCSG2: %> _  [ʼ|а|#] ;
!!€# му{нңʼØ}^SCSG2>нʼ
!!€0 мун0>дʼ
!!€# ңум{йнңъʼØ}^SCSG2>нʼ
!!€0 ңум00>дʼ
!| °: | ә: | а ] ;
!           [ %{йнңъʼØ%}: | %{нңʼØ%}: | ʼ: ] %> _  °: ʼ  ;
!  [ %{йнңъʼØ%}: | %{нңʼØ%}: | ʼ: ] %> _ [ °: ʼ | а | ә: | %{ая%}: ] ;
!!€# ңум{йнңъʼØ}^SCSG2>н°ʼ
!!€0 ңум00>д0ʼ

"%{нңʼØ%}:н GlottalNasalToSurface"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{нңʼØ%}:н <=> _ %> [[(м) ʼ| ˮ ] # | [н:|м:] д | д | с: | 0: ц ь # ] ;
!!€# му{нңʼØ}>нд
!!€0 мун>0д
!!€# му{нңʼØ}>сь
!!€0 мун0>зь

! [ %> [ Ы1: | [ н: | м: ] д | с: и ˮ | с: ь | т: | д: | °: ˮ | °: ц | °: м: д [ # | %> | а | и ] | °: м ʼ | °: ʼ | н: °: ʼ | н: ә: с ] | о ] ;
         _ %^SCSG2: %> ;
!!€# му{нңʼØ}^SCSG2>нʼ
!!€0 мун0>дʼ

"%{нңʼØ%}:ң GlottalNasalToSurface"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{нңʼØ%}:ң <=> _ %> [ к: ] ;
!!€# му{нңʼØ}>кʼ
!!€0 муң>гʼ

"%{йнңъʼØ%}:ң GlottalNasalToSurface"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{йнңъʼØ%}:ң <=> [ Vow: | °: ]  _ %> [ Ы1: | к: | о ] ;
!!€# ил°{йнңъʼØ}>к°ʼ
!!€0 илаң>г0ʼ

"%{йнңъʼØ%}:н GlottalNasalToSurface"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{йнңъʼØ%}:н <=> [ °:|[Cns - м] (ь:) а: ]  _ [ (%^SCSG2:) %> н:д | %> ( м:0 | н:0 ) д | %> д м ʼ |  %> с: ] ;
!!€# ил°{йнңъʼØ}^SCSG2>н
!!€0 илан0>д

! [ °:|Cns а]  _ [ (%^SCSG2:) %> н:д | %> ( м:0 | н:0 ) д | %> д м ʼ | %> ц: |  %> с: ] ;
 [ Cns - [м: | :м ]]  _ [ %> [ м:0 | н:0 ] д ] ;
! Cns  _ [ %> [ м:0 | н:0 ] д | %> ц: | %> ˮ ] ;
!  _ [ %> с: | (%^SCSG2:) %> н:д | %> ( м:0 | н:0 ) д | %> ц: | %> ˮ ] ;
!!€# ила%{йнңъʼØ%}%>сиˮ
!!€# илан%>зиˮ
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>н°ʼ
!!€0 илан%>д0ʼ
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>дмʼ
!!€0 илан%>дмʼ
!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>д°в° ! commenting out test with two outputs
!€0 илан%>дав0
!€0 ил0н%>дав0
!!€0 илан%>дув0
!!€0 ил0н%>дув0


"%{йнңъʼØ%}:ъ GlottalNasalToSurface"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{йнңъʼØ%}:ъ <=> л °: _ е ;
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}е
!!€# ил0ъе

"%{нңʼØ%}:0 GlottalNasalToSurface"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{нңʼØ%}:0 <=> _ %>  [ м [ н | а | и ]| ң | %{рл%}: | в: | н [и|а|о|#] ] ;
!!€# му%{нңʼØ%}%>мд
!!€0 му0%>нд
! [ м: [ °: | и | а ] | ʼ | н [ а | и | °: # ] | ң | %{рл%}: ] ;
!       where Cx in (%{нңʼØ%} %{йнңъʼØ%}) ;
!!€# му%{нңʼØ%}%>м°н%{ая%}
!!€0 му0%>м0на


"%{йнңъʼØ%}:0 GlottalNasalToSurface"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{йнңъʼØ%}:0 <=> [Cns: - м] (°:|(ь:) а:) _ %> [м | ң э |в:| ц ь | ˮ | н и # | н и :н | н #| ʼ | н и ʼ | н а ˮ| %{рл%}: ] ;
!          Cns: (°:) _ %^SCSG2: %>  н: ;
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%^SCSG2%>н
!!€0 илан0%>д


!  Cns: _ [ %> [(°:) м ʼ | м :Vow | м °: [н|ʼ]|(°:) ʼ| °: ˮ | °: ц ь °: | ң | %{рл%}: | к:г | с: | д: | м | н:д ] | %^SCSG2: %>  н: | о ];
!  Cns: °: _ [ %> [(°:) м: ʼ | м :Vow | м °: |(°:) ʼ| °: ˮ | °: ц ь °: | ң | %{рл%}:  | с: ] | о ];
! # Cns* Vow Cns °: _ %> [ °: [(м) ʼ| ˮ ] | ң э | м: [ (д) [°:| :Vow] ] | н (д) °: # | н (д) :Vow | %{рл%}: °: ] ;
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>°ˮ
!!€0 ила0%>0ˮ
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>°ць°
!!€0 ила0%>0ць0
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>м°н%{ая%}
!!€0 ил00%>мана
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>н°
!!€0 ила0%>н0
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>%{рл%}°
!!€0 ила0%>л0
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>мд°
!!€0 ила0%>нд0
   м: _ [ %> [ °: | к: | ң | с: | (м: | н:) д: | м: | н: | %{рл%}: | 0: ц ь ] | о | %^SCSG2: %> н: [ʼ|#|а] ] ;
!!€# ңум%{йнңъʼØ%}%>мʼ
!!€0 ңув0%>мʼ
!!€# ңум%{йнңъʼØ%}%^SCSG2%>нʼ
!!€0 ңум00%>дʼ
!!€# ңум%{йнңъʼØ%}%>0ць
!!€0 ңув0%>аць



"%{дˮØ%}:0 GlottalNonNasalToZERO LEFT"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{дˮØ%}:0 <=> _ [ %> [ д: | к | с: [ и | ь ] | [м:|н:] д: | ˮ [Vow|Cns] ] | %^SCSG2: %> н: ] ;
 Cns _ %> ˮ # ;
! _ [ %> [ д: | к | с: [ и | ь ] | [м:|н:] д: | ˮ [Vow|Cns|#] ] | %^SCSG2: %> н: ] ;
!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%^SCSG2%>нʼ
!!€0 мя00%>тʼ
! Vow _ %>  [ к: | н: °: ʼ | ˮ Cns °: | [ м: | н: ] д: [ °: | и | а | %{оё%}: | %{ая%}: ] | с: [ ь | и ] | ц ь | д: [ %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: | °: # | °: [ м: | н: | р | д | в а ˮ ] ] | д: а ˮ | д:т а ц ь | д: [ м ʼ | а м з ь | и н з ь | и | а # ] ]  ;
!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>мд°
!!€# мя0%>0т0
!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>д%{ая%}
!!€0 мя0%>та
!    Vow (Cns: (%^PalVariation:)) _ %^SCSG2: %> н: [ а с ь | °: ] ;
!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%^SCSG2%>нась
!!€0 мя00%>тась
! Cns: (%^PalVariation:) _ %>  [ (м) °: ʼ | °: м ʼ | °: ˮ | °: ц ь °: | ( м: | н: ) д: | к: | %{рл%}:  ]  ;
!!€# тар%^PalVariation%{дˮØ%}%>°мʼ
!!€# тар00%>0мʼ
!!€# тар%^PalVariation%{дˮØ%}%>%{рл%}°
!!€0 та000%>л0

!"%{дˮØ%}:0 GlottalNonNasalToZERO RIGHT"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! %{дˮØ%}:0 => _ %>  [ к: | н: °: ʼ | ˮ Cns °: | [ м: | н: ] д: [ °: | и | а | %{оё%}: | %{ая%}: ] | с: [ ь | и ] | ц ь | д: [ %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: | °: # | °: [ м: | н: | р | д | в а ˮ ] ] | д: а ˮ | д:т а ц ь | д: [ м ʼ | а м з ь | и н з ь | и | а # ] ]  ;
!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>мд°
!!€# мя0%>0т0
!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>д%{ая%}
!!€0 мя0%>та
 !    Vow (Cns: (%^PalVariation:)) _ %^SCSG2: %> н: [ а с ь | °: ] ;
!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%^SCSG2%>нась
!!€0 мя00%>тась
! Cns: (%^PalVariation:) _ %>  [ (м ) °: ʼ | °: м ʼ | °: ˮ | °: ц ь °: | ( м: | н: ) д: | к: | %{рл%}: ]  ;
!!€# тар%^PalVariation%{дˮØ%}%>%{рл%}°
!!€0 та000%>л0
!!€# тар%^PalVariation%{дˮØ%}%>мд%{ая%}
!!€0 тар00%>0та
!!€0 тар00%>0тя

!! RIGHT ARROW ONLY %{дˮØ%}:0
 !   Cns (%^PalVariation:) _ %> [ м | н: Vow | ң ] ;
!!€# тар%{дˮØ%}%>ми
!!€0 тарˮ%>ми
!!€0 тар0%>ми
!!€# тар%{дˮØ%}%>ни
!!€0 тарˮ%>ни
!!€0 тар0%>ни

"С1:0 GlottalNonNasalToZERO"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 С1:0 <=> _ %>  [ к: | н: ʼ | ˮ Cns  | [ м: | н: ] д: [  и | а |о| %{оё%}: | %{ая%}: | # ] | с: [ ь | и ] | ц ь | д: [ %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: |  # | (а) [ м: | н: | р | д | в а ˮ | о ] ] | д: а ˮ | д:т а ц ь | д: [ м  |н| и | а  | а в | у в|д|#] ]  ;
! _ %>  [ к: | н: °: ʼ | ˮ Cns °: | [ м: | н: ] д: [ °: | и | а |о| %{оё%}: | %{ая%}: ] | с: [ ь | и ] | ц ь | д: [ %{ая%}: | %{оё%}: |  # | (а) [ м: | н: | р | д | в а ˮ | о ] ] | д: а ˮ | д:т а ц ь | д: [ м ʼ | а м з ь | и н з ь | и | а # | а в | у в] ]  ;
! _ %> [ к: | н: | б: | с: ь | т ˮ ] ;
!!€# таС1%>мд°
!!€# та0%>0т0
!!€# таС1%>д%{ая%}
!!€0 та0%>та
!!€# ман°С1%>мд
!!€# мана0%>0т
!!€# ман°С1%>дмʼ
!!€0 мана0%>тмʼ
      _ %^SCSG2: %> н: [ а с ь | ʼ | # ] ;
!!€# таС1%^SCSG2%>нась
!!€0 та00%>тась
!!€# ман°С1%^SCSG2%>нʼ
!!€0 мана00%>тʼ
 Cns:  _ %>  [ (м) ʼ | ˮ ]  ;



"С1:ˮ UnderlyingToGlottal"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 С1:ˮ <=> _ [ #: | %> [  ( 0: ) %{рл%}: | м Vow | ң э |( 0: )  в: | ( 0: ) м °: | н [ Vow | # ] | 0: н [ # | %> ] ] ] ;
!!€# ман°С1%>0в
!!€0 манаˮ%>ам
! _ [ #: | %> [  ( 0: ) %{рл%}: | м Vow | ң э | в: | ( 0: ) м °: | н [ Vow | °: # ] | 0: н [ °: #| # | %> ] ] ] ;
! _ [ #: | %> м н а | %> %{вм%}:м ] ;

"%{дˮØ%}:ˮ UnderlyingToGlottal LEFT"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{дˮØ%}:ˮ <=> _ [%> [ %{ауоэØ%}: [ м | л ] | л Vow | 0: [ :м | :л | н ] # | н Vow | ң э | %{рл%}: | м Vow | в: а  | в: н ] | # ] ;
!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>%{ауоэØ%}л
!!€0 мяˮ%>ал
!!€# вар%{дˮØ%}%>вна
!!€0 варˮ%>мна

! Vow _ [ #: | %> [  ( 0: ) %{рл%}: | м Vow | ң э | ( 0: ) м °: | н [ Vow | °: # ] | 0: н [ °: #| # | %> ] ] ] ;
! _ [ #: | %> [ д:л а ц ь | и | м и | ң э | м а | а м н а | ( 0: ) м н а | н а | н [ и | # | %> ] ] ] ;
!    Cns (%^PalVariation:) _  #  ;
!!€# тар%{дˮØ%}
!!€0 тарˮ

!"%{дˮØ%}:ˮ UnderlyingToGlottal RIGHT"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! %{дˮØ%}:ˮ => Vow _ [ #: | %> [  ( 0: ) %{рл%}: | м Vow | ң э | ( 0: ) м °: | н [ Vow | °: # ] | 0: н [ °: #| # | %> ] ] ] ;
!    Cns (%^PalVariation:) _  #  ;
!!€# тар%{дˮØ%}
!!€0 тарˮ

!! RIGHT ARROW ONLY %{дˮØ%}:ˮ
!    Cns	(%^PalVariation:) _ %> [ м | н: Vow | ң ] ;
!!€# тар%{дˮØ%}%>ми
!!€0 тарˮ%>ми
!!€0 тар0%>ми
!!€# тар%{дˮØ%}%>ни
!!€0 тарˮ%>ни
!!€0 тар0%>ни


"%{нңʼØ%}:ʼ UnderlyingToGlottal"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 Cx:ʼ <=> _ #: ;
       where Cx in (%{нңʼØ%} %{йнңъʼØ%}) ;


"с => ц affrication after Stop"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 с:ц <=> [ С1: | %{дˮØ%}: | ˮ: | л ] %> _ [ ь | и ] ;
        [ л | р ] %> _ [ а | я | и | %{ая%}: | ь ] ;
!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>сь
!!€0 мя0%>ць

!!€# ман°С1%>сиˮ
!!€0 ман00%>циˮ

"с => з after nasal"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 с:з <=> [ м | н | %{нңʼØ%}: | %{йнңъʼØ%}: | ʼ: ] %> _ ;
!!€# му%{нңʼØ%}%>сь
!!€0 мун0%>зь
!!€# ила%{йнңъʼØ%}%>сиˮ
!!€# илан%>зиˮ
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>сиˮ
!!€0 ил0н%>зиˮ
!!€# ңум%{йнңъʼØ%}%>сиˮ
!!€0 ңум0%>зиˮ
